Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2012
81-12,145
Legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds that current economic conditions, lack of available industrial sites
and buildings, and declining resources at all levels of government adversely
affect the ability of Nebraska's cities and villages to obtain viable industrial
sites on which to build businesses, obtain buildings, and create jobs. Lack
of industrial sites and buildings also affects the ability of communities
to maintain and develop stable and growth-prone economies.

Furthermore,
the Legislature finds that Nebraska is at a competitive disadvantage for business
development relative to other states in the nation due to a lack of appropriately
sized industrial sites and buildings available for business relocations to
Nebraska and expansions. The future of investment and jobs in Nebraska will
suffer should the state continue to ignore this challenge.

To enhance
the economic development of the state and to provide for the general prosperity
of all of Nebraska's citizens, it is in the public interest to assist in the
provision of industrial-ready sites and buildings in all areas of the state.
The establishment of the Site and Building Development Fund will assist in
creating conditions favorable to meeting the industrial readiness of the state.

Laws 2011, LB388, § 2.